Hawaii statutes.
§651-15 Officer's return; how made.
The police officer shall make out a full inventory of the property attached and
return the same with the writ of attachment. The police officer shall return
the writ with the summons if issued at the same time; otherwise, within such
time after its receipt as is allowed for a return of summons, with certificate
of the police officer's proceedings endorsed thereon or attached thereto. [L
1905, c 84, §15; RL 1925, §2819; RL 1935, §4204; RL 1945, §10155; RL 1955,
§233-15; HRS §651-15; gen ch 1985]

Revision Note

"Indorsed" changed to "endorsed" pursuant
to §23G-15.

Rules of Court

See HRCP rule 4(g).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next